test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-mieqlkk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - mieʹlǩǩ â-stem: # Noun 'milk/maito' - full paradigm
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom: mieʹlǩǩ
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen: mieʹlǩ
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc: mieʹlǩ
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill: meâlkka
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc: mieʹlǩest
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Com: [miõʹlǩin, mieʹlǩin]
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Ess: mieʹlǩǩen
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Par: mieʹlǩǩed
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe: [mieʹlǩtaa, mieʹlǩtää]
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom: mieʹlǩ
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen: [miõʹlǩi, mieʹlǩi]
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc: [miõʹlǩid, mieʹlǩid]
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill: [miõʹlǩid, mieʹlǩid]
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc: [miõʹlǩin, mieʹlǩin]
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Com: [miõʹlǩivuiʹm, mieʹlǩivuiʹm]
     mieʹlǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe: [miõʹlǩitaa, miõʹlǩitää, mieʹlǩitaa, mieʹlǩitää]
